test/src/morphology/V-tundw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tundõ: # Verb 47 'eng /est tunda/fin' - full paradigm
     tundõ+V+Inf: tundõ
     tundõ+V+Ger: tundõs
     tundõ+V+Sup: tundõm
     tundõ+V+Sup+Ine: tundõmõs
     tundõ+V+Sup+Ela: tundõmõst
     tundõ+V+Sup+Tra: tundõmõks
     tundõ+V+Sup+Abe: tundõmõt
     tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tūndõb
     tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tundõt
     tundõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tundõbõd
     tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tūndiz
     tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tūndizt, tūndiztõ]
     tundõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tūndizt, tūndiztõ]
     tundõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tund
     tundõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tundõks
     tundõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tund
     tundõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tund
     tundõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tundõgid
     tundõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tundõg
     tundõ+V+Quo+Sg3: tundiji
     tundõ+V+ActPrfPrc: tundõn
     tundõ+V+PssPrfPrc: tundtõd
